Hawaii statutes.
[§485A-412] Denial, revocation, suspension,
withdrawal, restriction, condition, or limitation of registration. (a) If
the commissioner finds that it is in the public interest and subsection (d)
authorizes the action, the commissioner, under this chapter may deny an
application, or may condition or limit the registration of an applicant to be a
broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative,
and, if the applicant is a broker-dealer or investment adviser, of a partner,
officer, director, or person having a similar status or performing similar
functions, or a person directly or indirectly in control, of the broker-dealer
or investment adviser.

(b) If the commissioner finds that it is in
the public interest and subsection (d) authorizes the action, the commissioner,
under this chapter may revoke, suspend, condition, or limit the registration of
a registrant and, if the registrant is a broker-dealer or investment adviser,
of a partner, officer, director, or person having a similar status or
performing similar functions, or a person directly or indirectly in control, of
the broker-dealer or investment adviser; provided that the commissioner shall
not:

(1) Institute a revocation or suspension proceeding
under this subsection based on an order issued under a law of another state
that is reported to the commissioner or a designee of the commissioner more
than one year after the date of the order on which it is based; or

(2) Under subsection (d)(5)(A) or (B), issue an order
on the basis of an order issued under the securities act of another state
unless the other order was based on conduct for which subsection (d) would
authorize the action had the conduct occurred in this State.

(c) If the commissioner finds that it is in
the public interest and subsection (d)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8),
(9), (10), (12), (13), (14), or (15), authorizes the action, the commissioner,
under this chapter may censure, impose a bar, or impose a civil penalty in an
amount not to exceed a maximum of $50,000 for each violation on a registrant,
and, if the registrant is a broker-dealer or investment adviser, on a partner,
officer, director, or person having a similar status or performing similar
functions, or on a person directly or indirectly in control, of the
broker-dealer or investment adviser.

(d) A person may be disciplined under
subsections (a) to (c) if the person:

(1) Has filed an application for registration in this
State under this chapter or the predecessor act within the previous ten years
which as of the effective date of registration or as of any date after filing
in the case of an order denying effectiveness, was incomplete in any material
respect or contained a statement that, in light of the circumstances under
which it was made, was false or misleading with respect to a material fact;

(2) Wilfully violated or wilfully failed to comply
with this chapter or the predecessor act or a rule adopted or order issued
under this chapter or the predecessor act within the previous ten years;

(3) Has been convicted of any felony, or within the
previous ten years has been convicted of a misdemeanor, involving a security, a
commodity future or option contract, or an aspect of a business involving
securities, commodities, investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or
finance;

(4) Is enjoined or restrained by a court of competent
jurisdiction in an action instituted by the commissioner under this chapter or
the predecessor act, a state, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or the
United States from engaging in or continuing an act, practice, or course of
business involving an aspect of a business involving securities, commodities,
investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance;

(5) Is the subject of an order, issued after notice and
opportunity for hearing by:

(A) The securities or other financial
services regulator of a state or the Securities and Exchange Commission or
other federal agency denying, revoking, barring, or suspending registration as
a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser,
or investment adviser representative;

(B) The securities regulator of a state or
the Securities and Exchange Commission against a broker-dealer, agent,
investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or federal covered
investment adviser;

(C) The Securities and Exchange Commission or
a self-regulatory organization suspending or expelling the registrant from
membership in the self-regulatory organization;

(D) A court adjudicating a United States Postal
Service fraud order;

(E) The insurance regulator of a state
denying, suspending, or revoking registration as an insurance agent; or

(F) A depository institution or financial
services regulator suspending or barring the person from the depository institution
or other financial services business;

(6) Is the subject of an adjudication or
determination, after notice and opportunity for hearing, by the Securities and
Exchange Commission, the Commodity Futures Trading Commission; the Federal
Trade Commission; a federal depository institution regulator, or a depository
institution, insurance, or other financial services regulator of a state that
the person wilfully violated the Securities Act of 1933, the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, the Investment
Company Act of 1940, or the Commodity Exchange Act, the securities or
commodities law of a state, or a federal or state law under which a business
involving investments, franchises, insurance, banking, or finance is regulated;

(7) Is insolvent, either because the person's
liabilities exceed the person's assets or because the person cannot meet the
person's obligations as they mature; provided that the commissioner may not
enter an order against an applicant or registrant under this paragraph without
a finding of insolvency as to the applicant or registrant;

(8) Refuses to allow or otherwise impedes the
commissioner from conducting an audit or inspection under section 485A-411(d)
or refuses access to a registrant's office to conduct an audit or inspection
under section 485A-411(d);

(9) Has failed to reasonably supervise an agent,
investment adviser representative, or other individual, if the agent,
investment adviser representative, or other individual was subject to the person's
supervision and committed a violation of this chapter or the predecessor act or
a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter or the predecessor act within
the previous ten years of the violation;

(10) Has not paid the proper filing fee within thirty
days after having been notified by the commissioner of a deficiency; provided
that the commissioner shall vacate an order under this paragraph when the
deficiency is corrected;

(11) After notice and opportunity for a hearing, has
been found within the previous ten years:

(A) By a court of competent jurisdiction to
have wilfully violated the laws of a foreign jurisdiction under which the
business of securities, commodities, investment, franchises, insurance,
banking, or finance is regulated;

(B) To have been the subject of an order of a
securities regulator of a foreign jurisdiction denying, revoking, or suspending
the right to engage in the business of securities as a broker-dealer, agent,
investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or other similar person;
or

(C) To have been suspended or expelled from
membership by or participation in a securities exchange or securities
association operating under the securities laws of a foreign jurisdiction;

(12) Is the subject of a cease and desist order issued
by the Securities and Exchange Commission or issued under the securities,
commodities, investment, franchise, banking, finance, or insurance laws of a
state;

(13) Has engaged in dishonest or unethical practices
in the securities, commodities, investment, franchise, banking, finance, or
insurance business within the previous ten years;

(14) Has demonstrated unworthiness to transact the
business of broker-dealer, investment adviser, agent, or investment adviser
representative;

(15) Has not complied with an order of child support
or has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or
child support order pursuant to chapter 576D; or

(16) Is not qualified on the basis of factors such as
training, experience, and knowledge of the securities business; provided that
in the case of an application by an agent for a broker-dealer that is a member
of a self-regulatory organization or by an individual for registration as an
investment adviser representative, a denial order may not be based on this
paragraph if the individual has successfully completed all examinations
required by subsection (e). The commissioner may require an applicant for
registration under section 485A-402 or 485A-404 who has not been registered in
a state within the two years preceding the filing of an application in this
State to successfully complete an examination.

(e) A rule adopted or order issued under this
chapter may require that an examination, including an examination developed or
approved by an organization of securities regulators, be successfully completed
by a class of individuals or all individuals to be registered under this
chapter. An order issued under this chapter may waive, in whole or in part, an
examination as to an individual and a rule adopted under this chapter may
waive, in whole or in part, an examination as to a class of individuals if the
commissioner determines that the examination is not necessary or appropriate in
the public interest and for the protection of investors.

(f) The commissioner may suspend or deny an
application summarily; restrict, condition, limit, or suspend a registration;
or censure, bar, or impose a civil penalty on a registrant before final
determination of an administrative proceeding. Upon the issuance of an order,
the commissioner shall promptly notify each person subject to the order that
the order has been issued, the reasons for the action, and that within fifteen
days after the receipt of a request in a record from the person the matter will
be scheduled for a hearing. If a hearing is not requested and none is ordered
by the commissioner within thirty days after the date of service of the order,
the order shall become final by operation of law. If a hearing is requested or
ordered, the commissioner, after notice of and opportunity for hearing to each
person subject to the order, may modify or vacate the order or extend the order
until a final determination is made. During the pendency of any hearing
requested under this subsection, the order shall remain in effect unless
vacated or modified by the commissioner; provided that any penalty shall not
take effect until the final order is issued.

(g) An order issued under this section, except
under subsection (f), shall include:

(1) Appropriate notice to the applicant or
registrant;

(2) Opportunity for hearing; and

(3) Findings of fact and conclusions of law in
accordance with chapter 91.

(h) A person that controls, directly or
indirectly, a person not in compliance with this section may be disciplined by
order of the commissioner under subsections (a) to (c) to the same extent as
the noncomplying person, unless the controlling person did not know, and in the
exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of conduct
that is a ground for discipline under this section.

(i) The commissioner may not institute a
proceeding under subsection 485A-412(a), 485A-412(b), or 485A-412(c) based
solely on material facts actually known by the commissioner unless an
investigation or the proceeding is instituted within one year after the
commissioner actually acquires knowledge of the material facts. [L 2006, c 229,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next